District of Columbia statutes.
1-511

Review of personnel practices.

(a)

The District of Columbia Department of Human Resources shall conduct a comprehensive review of all regulations, policies, and standard operating procedures under its control to ensure compliance with all local and federal laws.

(b)

On or before March 1, 2012, and every 3 months thereafter until this review is complete, the District of Columbia Department of Human Resources shall report to the Council on the status of this review, the components that have been completed, the components that remain outstanding, and the projected timeline for completion of this project.

Mar. 14, 2012, D.C. Law 19-115, § 3, 59 DCR 461